California statutes. Corporations Code
(b) The acquisition of the successor entity’s securities by the rollup participants being combined or reorganized; provided however, that a rollup transaction shall not include any transaction that:

(1) The Securities and Exchange Commission
 exempts from the definition of a rollup transaction pursuant to subparagraph (c) (ii) of Item 901 of Regulation S-K adopted by the Securities and Exchange Commission.

(2) Is determined to be exempt from this definition by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation upon the commissioner’s determination that this action is in the public interest and consistent with the protection of investors.

(3) Involves one or more limited partnerships all of the securities of which are, prior to the transaction, securities for which transactions are reported under a transaction reporting plan declared effective before January 1, 1991, by the Securities and Exchange Commission under Section 11A of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.

(4) Involves only those issuers not required to register or report under
 Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, if the resulting issuer is also not required to register or report under Section 12.

(5) Involves the reorganization to corporate, trust, or association form or restructuring of a single limited partnership if, as a consequence of the proposed transaction there will be no significant, adverse change in any of the following: voting rights, the term of existence of the entity, management compensation, or investment objectives.

(6) Involves the reorganization to corporate, trust, or association form or restructuring of a single limited partnership if each investor is provided an option to retain a security under substantially the same terms and conditions as the original issue.

(7) Involves the reorganization to corporate, trust, or association form or
 restructuring of a single limited partnership if transactions in the security issued as a result of the reorganization or restructuring are not reported under a transaction reporting plan declared effective before January 1, 1991, by the Securities and Exchange Commission under Section 11A of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 71.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25014.7.

(a) “Eligible rollup transaction” means a rollup transaction in which the new securities issued are listed or approved for listing on a national securities exchange which has been certified by the commissioner under subdivision (o) of Section 25100, if the exchange requires as a condition to listing or designation that the rollup transaction be conducted in accordance with procedures to protect the rights of limited partners.

(b) The rights of limited partners will be presumed to be protected if the rollup transaction provides for the right of dissenting limited partners:

(1) To receive compensation for their limited partnership units based on an appraisal of
 the limited partnership assets performed by an independent appraiser unaffiliated with the sponsor or general partner of the limited partnership and which value the assets as if sold in an orderly manner in a reasonable period of time, plus or minus other balance sheet items, and less the cost of sale or refinancing. Compensation to dissenting limited partners of rollup transactions may be cash, secured debt instruments, unsecured debt instruments, or freely tradeable securities; provided, however, that:

(A) Rollups which utilize debt instruments as compensation provide for a trustee and an indenture to protect the rights of the debt holders and provide a rate of interest based upon, but not less than, the then applicable federal rate as determined in accordance with Section 1274 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(B) Rollups which utilize unsecured debt instruments as
 compensation, in addition to the requirements of subparagraph (A), limit total leverage to 70 percent of the appraised value of the assets.

(C) All debt securities have a term no greater than seven years and provide for prepayment with 80 percent of the net proceeds of any sale or refinancing of the assets previously owned by the entity or any part thereof.

(D) Freely tradeable securities utilized as compensation to dissenting limited partners must be issued by an issuer whose securities are listed on a national securities exchange that has been certified for at least one year prior to the transaction, and the number of securities to be received in return for limited partnership interests must be determined by an appraisal of limited partnership assets, conducted in a manner consistent with this paragraph, in relation to the average last sale price of the freely tradeable
 securities in the 20-day period following the transaction. If the issuer of the freely tradeable securities is affiliated with the sponsor or general partner, newly issued securities to be utilized as compensation to dissenting limited partners shall not represent more than 20 percent of the issued and outstanding shares of that class of securities after giving effect to the issuance. For the purposes of the preceding sentence, a sponsor or general partner is “affiliated” with the issuer of the freely tradeable securities if the sponsor or general partner receives any material compensation from the issuer or its affiliates in conjunction with the rollup transaction or the purchase of the general partner’s interest; provided, however, that nothing herein shall restrict the ability of a sponsor or general partner to receive any payment for its equity interests and compensation as otherwise provided by this section.

(2) To receive or retain a
 security with substantially the same terms and conditions as the security originally held, provided that the receipt or retention of that security is not a step in a series of subsequent transactions that directly or indirectly through acquisition or otherwise involves future combinations or reorganizations of one or more rollup participants. Securities received or retained will be considered to have the same terms and conditions as the security originally held if:

(A) There is no material adverse change to dissenting limited partners’ rights, including, but not limited to, rights with respect to voting, the business plan, or the investment, distribution, management compensation and liquidation policies of the limited partnership or resulting entity.

(B) The dissenting limited partners receive the same preferences, privileges, and priorities as they had pursuant to the security
 originally held.

The rights set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) are the only rights of dissenting limited partners to which the presumption under this subdivision applies. A general partner or sponsor shall file an application for qualification pursuant to Section 25110 or Section 25120 with respect to any other rights proposed to be offered to dissenting limited partners.

At the time a registration statement is filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission with respect to an eligible rollup transaction, a general partner or sponsor shall notify, to the maximum extent permitted by the federal securities laws, each limited partner who has an address in this state by certified mail of the following: That a registration statement has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission with respect to a rollup transaction; that the general partner or sponsor claims an exemption from the review process under the law by
 virtue of Section 25014.7, which defines “eligible rollup transaction”; that the general partner or sponsor has the burden of proof under the law that the transaction meets the definition of eligible rollup transaction; and that the commissioner does not recommend or endorse the transaction.

(c) The rights of limited partners shall be presumed not to be protected if the general partner:

(1) Converts an equity interest in the limited partnerships subject to a rollup for which consideration was not paid and which was not otherwise provided for in the limited partnership agreement and disclosed to limited partners, into a voting interest in the new entity, provided, however, an interest originally obtained in order to comply with the provisions of Internal Revenue Service Revenue Proclamation 89-12 may be converted.

(2) Fails to follow the valuation provisions in the limited partnership agreements of the subject limited partners when valuing their limited partnership interests.

(3) Utilizes a future value of their equity interest rather than the current value of their equity interest, as determined by an appraisal conducted in a manner consistent with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), when determining their interest in the new entity.

(d) The rights of limited partners shall be presumed not to be protected as to voting rights, if:

(1) The voting rights in the entity resulting from a rollup do not generally follow the original voting rights of the limited partnerships participating in the rollup transaction.

(2) A majority of the interest in an entity
 resulting from a rollup transaction may not, without concurrence by the sponsor, general partners, board of directors or trustee, depending on the form of entity, vote to:

(A) Amend the limited partnership agreement, articles of incorporation or bylaws, or indenture.

(B) Dissolve the entity.

(C) Remove management and elect new management.

(D) Approve or disapprove the sale of substantially all of the assets of the entity.

(3) The general partner or sponsor proposing a rollup is not required to provide each person whose equity interest is subject to the rollup transaction with a document which instructs the person on the proper procedure for voting against or dissenting from the rollup
 transaction.

(4) The general partner or sponsor does not utilize an independent third party to receive and tabulate all votes and dissents, and require that the third party make the tabulation available to the general partner and any limited partner upon request at any time during and after voting occurs.

(e) The rights of limited partners shall be presumed not to be protected as to transaction costs if:

(1) Limited partners bear an unfair portion of the transaction costs of a proposed rollup transaction that is rejected. For purposes of this provision, transaction costs are defined as the costs of printing and mailing the proxy, prospectus, or other documents; legal fees not related to the solicitation of votes or tenders; financial advisory fees; investment banking fees; appraisal fees; accounting fees; independent
 committee expenses; travel expenses; and all other fees related to the preparatory work of the transaction, but not including costs that would have otherwise been incurred by the subject limited partnerships in the ordinary course of business, or solicitation expenses.

(2) Transaction costs of a rejected rollup transaction are not apportioned between general and limited partners of the subject limited partnerships according to the final vote on the proposed transaction as follows:

(A) The general partner or sponsor bears all rollup transaction costs in proportion to the number of votes to reject the rollup transaction.

(B) Limited partners bear transaction costs in proportion to the number of votes to approve the rollup transaction.

(3) The dissenting
 limited partnership is required to pay any of the costs of the rollup transaction and the general partner or sponsor is not required to pay the rollup transaction costs on behalf of the dissenting limited partnerships in a rollup in which one or more limited partnerships determines not to approve the transaction, but where the rollup transaction is consummated with respect to one or more approving limited partnerships.

(f) The rights of limited partners shall be presumed not to be protected as to fees of general partners and sponsors, if:

(1) General partners and sponsors are not prevented from receiving both unearned management fees discounted to a present value, if those fees were not previously provided for in the limited partnership agreement and disclosed to limited partners, and new asset-based fees.

(2) Property management fees and other management fees are not appropriate, not reasonable and greater than what would be paid to third parties for performing similar services.

(3) Changes in fees which are substantial and adverse to limited partners are not approved by an independent committee according to the facts and circumstances of each transaction.

(g) A general partner or sponsor proposing a rollup transaction shall pay all solicitation expenses related to the transaction, including all preparatory work related thereto, in the event the rollup transaction is not approved. For purposes of this section, “solicitation expenses” include direct marketing expenses such as telephone calls, broker-dealer factsheets, legal and other fees related to the solicitation, as well as direct solicitation compensation to brokers and dealers.

(h) A broker or dealer may not receive compensation for soliciting votes or tenders from limited partners in connection with a rollup transaction unless that compensation:

(1) Is payable and equal in amount regardless of whether the limited partner votes affirmatively or negatively in the proposed rollup.

(2) In the aggregate, does not exceed 2 percent of the exchange value of the newly created securities.

(3) Is paid regardless of whether the limited partners reject the proposed rollup transaction.

(i) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Limited partnership” includes any entity
 determined to be a “partnership” pursuant to Section 14(h)(4)(B) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or such other entity having a substantially economically equivalent form of ownership instrument.

(2) “Dissenting limited partner” means a holder or a beneficial interest in a limited partnership that is the subject of a rollup transaction who casts a vote against the rollup transaction, except that for purposes of an exchange or tender offer dissenting limited partner means any person who files a dissent from the terms of the transaction with the party responsible for tabulating the votes or tenders, to be received in connection with the transaction during the period in which the offer is outstanding.

(3) “Management fee” means a fee paid to the sponsor, general partner, their affiliates, or other persons for management and administration of the limited
 partnership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 131, Sec. 8.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

25015.

“Real estate development” means a development (a) which consists or will consist of separately owned lots, parcels or areas with either or both of the following features: (1) one or more additional continguous or noncontiguous lots, parcels, or areas owned in common by the owners of the separately owned lots, parcels, or areas, or (2) mutual, common, or reciprocal interests in or restrictions upon all or portions of such separately owned lots, parcels, or areas; and (b) in which the several owners of the separately owned lots, parcels, or areas have rights, directly or indirectly, to the beneficial use and enjoyment of the lots, parcels, or areas owned in common, or any one or more of them or portions thereof or interests therein, or of the interests or restrictions referred to in clause (a) above, or both. The estate in a separately or commonly owned lot, parcel, or area may be an estate of inheritance or perpetual estate, an estate for life, or an estate for years. The common ownership of the lots, parcels, or areas or the enjoyment of the interests or restrictions referred to in clause (a) above or both may be through ownership of shares of stock or memberships in an owners’ association or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25016.

“Rule” means any published regulation or standard of general application issued by the commissioner. “Order” means a consent, authorization, approval, permit, or requirement applicable to a specific case issued by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25017.

(a) “Sale” or “sell” includes every contract of sale of, contract to sell, or disposition of, a security or interest in a security for value. “Sale” or “sell” includes any exchange of securities and any change in the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of or on outstanding securities.

(b) “Offer” or “offer to sell” includes every attempt or offer to dispose of, or solicitation of an offer to buy, a security or interest in a security for value.

(c) Any security given or delivered with, or as a bonus on account of, any purchase of securities or any other thing constitutes a part of the subject of the purchase and is considered to have been offered and sold for value.

(d) A purported gift of assessable stock involves an offer and sale.

(e) Every sale or offer of a warrant or right to purchase or subscribe to another security of the same or another issuer, as well as every sale or offer of a security which gives the holder a present or future right or privilege to convert the security into another security of the same or another issuer, includes an offer and sale of the other security only at the time of the offer or sale of the warrant or right or convertible security; but neither the exercise of the right to purchase or subscribe or to convert nor the issuance of securities pursuant thereto is an offer or sale.

(f) The terms defined in this section do not include: (1) any bona fide secured transaction in or loan of outstanding securities; (2) any stock dividend payable with respect to common stock of a corporation solely (except for any cash or scrip paid for fractional shares) in shares of such common stock, if the corporation has no other class of voting stock outstanding; provided, that shares issued in any such dividend shall be subject to any conditions previously imposed by the commissioner applicable to the shares with respect to which they are issued; or (3) any act incident to a transaction or reorganization approved by a state or federal court in which securities are issued and exchanged for one or more outstanding securities, claims, or property interests, or partly in that exchange and partly for cash, and nothing in this division shall be construed to prohibit a court from applying the protections described in Section 25014.7 or 25140 and the regulations adopted thereunder when approving any transaction involving a rollup participant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 48, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

25018.

“Securities Act of 1933,” “Securities Exchange Act of 1934,” “Investment Advisers Act of 1940,” and “Investment Company Act of 1940” mean the federal statutes of those names as amended before or after the effective date of this law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 190, Sec. 13.   (AB 1517)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25019.

“Security” means any note; stock; treasury stock; membership in an incorporated or unincorporated association; bond; debenture; evidence of indebtedness; certificate of interest or participation in any profit-sharing agreement; collateral trust certificate; preorganization certificate or subscription; transferable share; investment contract; viatical settlement contract or a fractionalized or pooled interest therein; life settlement contract or a fractionalized or pooled interest therein; voting trust certificate; certificate of deposit for a security; interest in a limited liability company and any class or series of those interests (including any fractional or other interest in that interest), except a membership interest in a limited liability company in which the person claiming this exception can prove that all of the members are actively engaged in the management of the limited liability company; provided that evidence that members vote or have the right to vote, or the right to information concerning the business and affairs of the limited liability company, or the right to participate in management, shall not establish, without more, that all members are actively engaged in the management of the limited liability company; certificate of interest or participation in an oil, gas or mining title or lease or in payments out of production under that title or lease; put, call, straddle, option, or privilege on any security, certificate of deposit, or group or index of securities (including any interest therein or based on the value thereof); or any put, call, straddle, option, or privilege entered into on a national securities exchange relating to foreign currency; any beneficial interest or other security issued in connection with a funded employees’ pension, profit sharing, stock bonus, or similar benefit plan; or, in general, any interest or instrument commonly known as a “security”; or any certificate of interest or participation in, temporary or interim certificate for, receipt for, guarantee of, or warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase, any of the foregoing. All of the foregoing are securities whether or not evidenced by a written document. “Security” does not include: (1) any beneficial interest in any voluntary inter vivos trust which is not created for the purpose of carrying on any business or solely for the purpose of voting, or (2) any beneficial interest in any testamentary trust, or (3) any insurance or endowment policy or annuity contract under which an insurance company admitted in this state promises to pay a sum of money (whether or not based upon the investment performance of a segregated fund) either in a lump sum or periodically for life or some other specified period, or (4) any franchise subject to registration under the Franchise Investment Law (Division 5 (commencing with Section 31000)), or exempted from registration by Section 31100 or 31101.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 705, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25020.

“State” means any state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia and Puerto Rico.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25021.

“Subdivided lands” and “subdivision” have the meanings prescribed in Sections 11000, 11004.5, and 11218 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

25022.

“Underwriter” means a person who has agreed with an issuer or other person on whose behalf a distribution is to be made (a) to purchase securities for distribution or (b) to distribute securities for or on behalf of such issuer or other person or (c) to manage or supervise a distribution of securities for or on behalf of such issuer or other person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25023.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), “viatical settlement contract” means an agreement entered into between a person owning a life insurance policy upon the life of a person with a catastrophic or life-threatening illness or condition and another person by which the policy owner receives compensation or anything of value less than the death benefits of the insurance policy in return for an assignment, transfer, sale, devise, or bequest of the death benefits or ownership of the insurance policy, and “life settlement contract” means an agreement, other than a viatical settlement contract, for the purchase, sale, assignment, transfer, devise, or bequest of any portion of the death benefit or ownership of a life insurance policy or certificate for consideration that is less than the
 expected death benefit of the life insurance policy or certificate.

(b) “Viatical settlement contract” and “life settlement contract” do not include any of the following:

(1) The assignment, transfer, sale, devise, or bequest of a death benefit, life insurance policy, or certificate of insurance by the insured or the original owner to any person if the assignment, transfer, sale, devise, or bequest (A) is not accompanied by the publication of any advertisement and (B) is not effected by or through a broker-dealer (Section 25004).

(2) The assignment of a life insurance policy to a bank, savings bank, savings association, credit union, or other lender (either licensed or not required to be licensed) as collateral for a loan, or to a stop-loss insurer or reinsurer.

(3) The exercise of accelerated benefits pursuant to the terms of a life insurance policy issued in accordance with the insurance laws of this state.

(4) The assignment, transfer, sale, devise, or bequest of any undivided death benefit, life insurance policy, or certificate of insurance by an entity licensed pursuant to Section 10113.2 of the Insurance Code, or a viatical or life settlement provider licensed from another state, to one individual or entity, provided that the individual or entity represents that the individual or entity is purchasing for its own account (or trust account, if the entity is a trustee) and not with a view to or for sale in connection with a distribution of the individual death benefit, life insurance policy, or certificate of insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 43.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 2. QUALIFICATION OF AND FILING REQUIREMENTS FOR THE SALE OF SECURITIES [25100. - 25166.]



  CHAPTER 1. Exemptions and Certain Securities and Transactions Not Subject to Qualification [25100. - 25105.]

25100.

The following securities are exempted from Sections 25110, 25120, and 25130:

(a) Any security (including a revenue obligation) issued or guaranteed by the United States, any state, any city, county, city and county, public district, public authority, public corporation, public entity, or political subdivision of a state or any agency or corporate or other instrumentality of any one or more of the foregoing; or any certificate of deposit for any of the foregoing.

(b) Any security issued or guaranteed by Canada, any Canadian province, any political subdivision or municipality of that province, or by any other foreign government with which the United States currently maintains diplomatic relations, if the security is
 recognized as a valid obligation by the issuer or guarantor; or any certificate of deposit for any of the foregoing.

(c) Any security issued or guaranteed by and representing an interest in or a direct obligation of a national bank or a bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state, and any security issued by a bank to one or more other banks and representing an interest in an asset of the issuing bank.

(d) Any security issued or guaranteed by a federal savings association or federal savings bank or federal land bank or joint land bank or national farm loan association or by any savings association, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 5102 of the Financial Code, which is subject to the supervision and regulation of the Commissioner of
 Financial Protection and Innovation of this state.

(e) Any security (other than an interest in all or portions of a parcel or parcels of real property which are subdivided land or a subdivision or in a real estate development), the issuance of which is subject to authorization by the Insurance Commissioner, the Public Utilities Commission, or the Real Estate Commissioner of this state.

(f) Any security consisting of any interest in all or portions of a parcel or parcels of real property that are subdivided lands or a subdivision or in a real estate development; provided that the exemption in this subdivision shall not be applicable to: (1) any investment contract sold or offered for sale with, or as part of, that interest, or (2) any person engaged in the business of selling, distributing, or supplying water for irrigation purposes or
 domestic use that is not a public utility except that the exemption is applicable to any security of a mutual water company (other than an investment contract as described in paragraph (1)) offered or sold in connection with subdivided lands pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 14310) of Part 7 of Division 3 of Title 1.

(g) Any mutual capital certificates or savings accounts, as defined in the Savings Association Law, issued by a savings association, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 5102 of the Financial Code, and holding a license or certificate of authority then in force from the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation of this state.

(h) Any
 security issued or guaranteed by any federal credit union, or by any credit union organized and supervised, or regulated, under the Credit Union Law.

(i) Any security issued or guaranteed by any railroad, other common carrier, public utility, or public utility holding company which is regulated in respect of the issuance or guarantee of the security by a governmental authority of the United States, of any state, of Canada or of any Canadian province; and the security is subject to registration with or authorization of issuance by that authority.

(j) Any security (except evidences of indebtedness, whether interest bearing or not) of an issuer (1) organized exclusively for educational, benevolent, fraternal, religious, charitable, social, or reformatory purposes and not for pecuniary profit, if no part of the net earnings of the issuer inures to the benefit of any private
 shareholder or individual, or (2) organized as a chamber of commerce or trade or professional association. The fact that amounts received from memberships or dues or both will or may be used to construct or otherwise acquire facilities for use by members of the nonprofit organization does not disqualify the organization for this exemption. This exemption does not apply to the securities of any nonprofit organization if any promoter thereof expects or intends to make a profit directly or indirectly from any business or activity associated with the organization or operation of that nonprofit organization or from remuneration received from that nonprofit organization.

(k) Any agreement, commonly known as a “life income contract,” of an issuer (1) organized exclusively for educational, benevolent, fraternal, religious, charitable, social, or reformatory purposes and not for pecuniary profit and (2) which the commissioner designates by rule or
 order, with a donor in consideration of a donation of property to that issuer and providing for the payment to the donor or persons designated by the donor of income or specified periodic payments from the donated property or other property for the life of the donor or those other persons.

(l) Any note, draft, bill of exchange, or banker’s acceptance which is freely transferable and of prime quality, arises out of a current transaction or the proceeds of which have been or are to be used for current transactions, and which evidences an obligation to pay cash within nine months of the date of issuance, exclusive of days of grace, or any renewal of that paper which is likewise limited, or any guarantee of that paper or of that renewal, provided that the paper is not offered to the public in amounts of less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in the aggregate to any one purchaser. In addition, the commissioner may, by rule or order,
 exempt any issuer of any notes, drafts, bills of exchange, or banker’s acceptances from qualification of those securities when the commissioner finds that the qualification is not necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors.

(m) Any security issued by any corporation organized and existing under the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54001) of Division 20 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(n) Any beneficial interest in an employees’ pension, profit-sharing, stock bonus, or similar benefit plan which meets the requirements for qualification under Section 401 of the federal Internal Revenue Code or any statute amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto. A determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service stating that an employees’ pension, profit-sharing, stock bonus, or similar benefit plan meets those requirements shall
 be conclusive evidence that the plan is an employees’ pension, profit-sharing, stock bonus, or similar benefit plan within the meaning of the first sentence of this subdivision until the date the determination letter is revoked in writing by the Internal Revenue Service, regardless of whether or not the revocation is retroactive.

(o) Any security listed or approved for listing upon notice of issuance on a national securities exchange, if the exchange has been certified by rule or order of the commissioner and any warrant or right to purchase or subscribe to the security. The exemption afforded by this subdivision does not apply to securities listed or approved for listing upon notice of issuance on a national securities exchange, in a rollup transaction unless the rollup transaction is an eligible rollup transaction as defined in Section 25014.7.

That certification of any exchange shall be made by the
 commissioner upon the written request of the exchange if the commissioner finds that the exchange, in acting on applications for listing of common stock, substantially applies the minimum standards set forth in either subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1), and, in considering suspension or removal from listing, substantially applies each of the criteria set forth in paragraph (2).

(1) Listing standards:

(A) (i) Shareholders’ equity of at least four million dollars ($4,000,000).

(ii) Pretax income of at least seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) in the issuer’s last fiscal year or in two of its last three fiscal years.

(iii) Minimum public distribution of 500,000 shares (exclusive of the holdings of officers,
 directors, controlling shareholders, and other concentrated or family holdings), together with a minimum of 800 public holders or minimum public distribution of 1,000,000 shares together with a minimum of 400 public holders. The exchange may also consider the listing of a company’s securities if the company has a minimum of 500,000 shares publicly held, a minimum of 400 shareholders and daily trading volume in the issue has been approximately 2,000 shares or more for the six months preceding the date of application. In evaluating the suitability of an issue for listing under this trading provision, the exchange shall review the nature and frequency of that activity and any other factors as it may determine to be relevant in ascertaining whether the issue is suitable for trading. A security that trades infrequently shall not be considered for listing under this paragraph even though average daily volume amounts to 2,000 shares per day or more.

Companies whose
 securities are concentrated in a limited geographical area, or whose securities are largely held in block by institutional investors, normally may not be considered eligible for listing unless the public distribution appreciably exceeds 500,000 shares.

(iv) Minimum price of three dollars ($3) per share for a reasonable period of time prior to the filing of a listing application; provided, however, in certain instances an exchange may favorably consider listing an issue selling for less than three dollars ($3) per share after considering all pertinent factors, including market conditions in general, whether historically the issue has sold above three dollars ($3) per share, the applicant’s capitalization, and the number of outstanding and publicly held shares of the issue.

(v) An aggregate market value for publicly held shares of at least three million dollars ($3,000,000).

(B) (i) Shareholders’ equity of at least four million dollars ($4,000,000).

(ii) Minimum public distribution set forth in clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(iii) Operating history of at least three years.

(iv) An aggregate market value for publicly held shares of at least fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000).

(2) Criteria for consideration of suspension or removal from listing:

(A) If a company that (i) has shareholders’ equity of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) has sustained net losses in each of its two most recent fiscal years, or (ii) has net tangible assets of less than
 three million dollars ($3,000,000) and has sustained net losses in three of its four most recent fiscal years.

(B) If the number of shares publicly held (excluding the holdings of officers, directors, controlling shareholders, and other concentrated or family holdings) is less than 150,000.

(C) If the total number of shareholders is less than 400 or if the number of shareholders of lots of 100 shares or more is less than 300.

(D) If the aggregate market value of shares publicly held is less than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000).

(E) If shares of common stock sell at a price of less than three dollars ($3) per share for a substantial period of time and the issuer shall fail to effectuate a reverse stock split of the shares within a
 reasonable period of time after being requested by the exchange to take that action.

A national securities exchange, certified by rule or order of the commissioner under this subdivision, shall file annual reports when requested to do so by the commissioner. The annual reports shall contain, by issuer: the variances granted to an exchange’s listing standards, including variances from corporate governance and voting rights’ standards, for any security of that issuer; the reasons for the variances; a discussion of the review procedure instituted by the exchange to determine the effect of the variances on investors and whether the variances should be continued; and any other information that the commissioner deems relevant. The purpose of these reports is to assist the commissioner in determining whether the quantitative and qualitative requirements of this subdivision are substantially being met by the exchange in general or with regard to any particular security.

The commissioner after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) may, in the commissioner’s discretion, by rule or order, decertify any exchange previously certified that ceases substantially to apply the minimum standards or criteria as set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2).

A rule or order of certification shall conclusively establish that any security listed or approved for listing upon notice of issuance on any exchange named in a rule or order of certification, and any warrant or right to purchase or subscribe to that security, is exempt under this subdivision until the adoption by the commissioner of any rule or order decertifying the exchange.

(p) A promissory note secured by a lien
 on real property, which is neither one of a series of notes of equal priority secured by interests in the same real property nor a note in which beneficial interests are sold to more than one person or entity.
